Utah statutes.
73-10d-7.   Agreements by political subdivisions for privatization projects
-- Joint interests.
(1)  Any one or more political subdivisions, or the United States or any of
its agencies, may enter into long-term agreements with any person for joint or
cooperative action related to the acquisition, construction, maintenance,
ownership, operation, and improvement of privatization projects in accordance
with the terms, conditions, and consideration provided in any long-term
agreements.  Any payments made by a political subdivision under a long-term
agreement for joint or cooperative action may not be construed to be an
indebtedness of or a lending of the credit of the political subdivision within
the meaning of any constitutional or statutory restriction, and, except as
required by this chapter and the constitution, no election is necessary for
the authorization of any long-term agreement for joint or cooperative action.
(2)  Any one or more political subdivisions may construct, purchase, or
otherwise acquire joint interests in any privatization project or any part of
a privatization project, for common use with any private entity or other
political subdivision, or may sell or lease to any other political subdivision
or person a partial interest in a privatization project.  Political
subdivisions may finance their joint interests in privatization projects in
the manner provided for and subject to Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government
Bonding Act, if otherwise eligible thereunder to finance capital improvement.
